Illinois, session 104th, HB3656.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Municipal Home Rule Charter Act. 6    Section 5. Charter.7    (a) Any home rule municipality with a population over 8500,000 people may adopt a charter to govern municipal 9affairs. 10        (1) A charter shall be its organic law. 11        (2) A charter must be consistent with the Illinois 12    Constitution and U.S. Constitution. 13        (3) Unless a State law specifically applies to home 14    rule or charter municipalities, language in charters shall 15    be considered supreme when in conflict with a State law. 16    (b) A qualifying municipality may create a charter 17commission by a vote of two-thirds vote of the entire 18legislative body of the municipality. 19        (1) A charter commission shall have the same number of 20    members as the legislative body of the municipality. 21        (2) When a charter commission is created, its members 22    shall be elected at the next regular general election, if 23    the ordinance creating the commission is enacted by   HB3656- 2 -LRB104 10892 RTM 20974 b1    December 31 of the year prior to a general election in 2    which the President of the United States or the Governor 3    is elected. 4        (3) Provisions for petitions, including, but not 5    limited to, filing petitions, shall be governed by the 6    ordinance creating the commission. 7        (4) Upon certification of the election, the commission 8    is considered established and shall hold an organizing 9    meeting within 60 days of its creation. 10        (5) Administrative support shall be provided by the 11    clerk of the municipality. 12        (6) To be eligible to serve on the commission, a 13    person must be a registered voter in the municipality, 14    have resided in the municipality for at least 1 year, and 15    be 18 years of age by the date of the election of 16    commissioners. 17        (7) The salary of commission members shall be equal to 18    the salary of the lowest earning municipal legislator and 19    the commission shall have a budget equal to the average of 20    the last 3 years of the total budget of the legislative 21    department of the municipality, including, but not limited 22    to, salaries, staff, and offices. 23        (8) The commission shall have the power to designate 24    its officers and rules, other than that it must elect a 25    chairperson. Until a chairperson is elected, the clerk of 26    the municipality shall serve as acting chairperson. As   HB3656- 3 -LRB104 10892 RTM 20974 b1    acting chairperson, the clerk shall have no power other 2    than to call the commission to order and govern the 3    election of the chairperson in a manner consistent with 4    Robert's Rules of Order Newly Revised. 5        (9) The commission may hire staff as necessary. 6        (10) Within one year of the first organizing meeting 7    of the commission, the commission shall prepare a charter 8    to be approved by a majority of commissioners. Upon 9    adoption of a charter by the charter commission, it shall 10    go before voters at the next regular general election. 11            (A) Upon receiving 60% of the vote, the charter is 12        considered adopted. 13            (B) If the charter fails, then the process is dead 14        and a municipal legislative body must pass a new 15        ordinance for a new commission in order to adopt a 16        charter.17            (C) If the charter commission fails to adopt a 18        charter, then the commission shall expire.